Maine, session 132, LD2127.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 30-A MRSA §4907, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2023, c. 559, §1, is further
amended to read:
1. Limitations on amount of outstanding principal. The Maine State Housing
Authority may not at any time have an aggregate principal amount outstanding, in excess
of $3,000,000,000 $4,000,000,000 of mortgage purchase bonds secured by the Housing
Reserve Fund or a Capital Reserve Fund to which section 4906, subsection 3, paragraph A
applies. Mortgage purchase bonds of the Maine State Housing Authority secured by capital
reserve funds to which section 4906, subsection 3, paragraph A does not apply, bond or
mortgage insurance, direct or indirect contract with the United States, purchase or
repurchase agreement of guaranty with a banking or other financial organization or other
credit arrangements securing the bonds may be issued up to $100,000,000 per calendar year
in an aggregate principal amount outstanding at any time not to exceed $300,000,000.
Page 1 - 132LR2895(03)